Utah statutes.
59-7-403.   Worldwide combined report.

(1)  A unitary group may elect to file a worldwide combined report.

(2)  Corporations electing to file a worldwide combined report may not thereafter elect to file a return on a basis other than a worldwide combined report without the consent of the commission.

